Maine, session 132, LD1948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the MaineCare program.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $117,618,761 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,618,761 $0 $0
2128 PART B
Sec. B-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Deappropriates one-time funding provided in Public Law 2025, chapter 2, Part
D for the MaineCare program.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($117,618,761) $0
0 __________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($117,618,761) $0
3239 Sec. B-2. Effective date. This Part takes effect June 20, 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved, except as otherwise indicated.